prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX T Y 672
SFX T ti      t               ti        
SFX T ti      davau           ti        
SFX T ti      davai           ti        
SFX T ti      davo            ti        
SFX T ti      davome          ti        
SFX T ti      davom           ti        
SFX T ti      davote          ti        
SFX T ti      davot           ti        
SFX T tis     davausi         tis       
SFX T tis     davaisi         tis       
SFX T tis     davosi          tis       
SFX T tis     davomės         tis       
SFX T tis     davotės         tis       
SFX T ti      siu             [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T ti      si              [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T ti      s               [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T ti      sime            [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T ti      sim             [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T ti      site            [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T ti      sit             [^sšzž]ti 
SFX T sti     siu             sti       
SFX T sti     si              sti       
SFX T sti     s               sti       
SFX T sti     sime            sti       
SFX T sti     sim             sti       
SFX T sti     site            sti       
SFX T sti     sit             sti       
SFX T ti      iu              šti       
SFX T ti      i               šti       
SFX T šti     š               šti       
SFX T ti      ime             šti       
SFX T ti      im              šti       
SFX T ti      ite             šti       
SFX T ti      it              šti       
SFX T žti     šiu             žti       
SFX T žti     ši              žti       
SFX T žti     š               žti       
SFX T žti     šime            žti       
SFX T žti     šim             žti       
SFX T žti     šite            žti       
SFX T žti     šit             žti       
SFX T tis     siuosi          [^sšzž]tis
SFX T tis     siesi           [^sšzž]tis
SFX T tis     sis             [^sšzž]tis
SFX T tis     simės           [^sšzž]tis
SFX T tis     sitės           [^sšzž]tis
SFX T stis    siuosi          stis      
SFX T stis    siesi           stis      
SFX T stis    sis             stis      
SFX T stis    simės           stis      
SFX T stis    sitės           stis      
SFX T tis     iuosi           štis      
SFX T tis     iesi            štis      
SFX T štis    šis             štis      
SFX T tis     imės            štis      
SFX T tis     itės            štis      
SFX T žtis    šiuosi          žtis      
SFX T žtis    šiesi           žtis      
SFX T žtis    šis             žtis      
SFX T žtis    šimės           žtis      
SFX T žtis    šitės           žtis      
SFX T ti      čiau            ti        
SFX T ti      tum             ti        
SFX T ti      tumei           ti        
SFX T ti      tų              ti        
SFX T ti      tume            ti        
SFX T ti      tumėme          ti        
SFX T ti      tumėm           ti        
SFX T ti      tumėte          ti        
SFX T ti      tumėt           ti        
SFX T ti      tute            ti        
SFX T ti      tut             ti        
SFX T tis     čiausi          tis       
SFX T tis     tumeis          tis       
SFX T tis     tumeisi         tis       
SFX T tis     tųsi            tis       
SFX T tis     tumės           tis       
SFX T tis     tumėmės         tis       
SFX T tis     tumėtės         tis       
SFX T tis     tutės           tis       
SFX T ti      k               [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kime            [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kim             [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kite            [^kg]ti   
SFX T ti      kit             [^kg]ti   
SFX T kti     k               kti       
SFX T kti     kime            kti       
SFX T kti     kim             kti       
SFX T kti     kite            kti       
SFX T kti     kit             kti       
SFX T gti     k               gti       
SFX T gti     kime            gti       
SFX T gti     kim             gti       
SFX T gti     kite            gti       
SFX T gti     kit             gti       
SFX T tis     kis             [^kg]tis  
SFX T tis     kimės           [^kg]tis  
SFX T tis     kitės           [^kg]tis  
SFX T ktis    kis             ktis      
SFX T ktis    kimės           ktis      
SFX T ktis    kitės           ktis      
SFX T gtis    kis             gtis      
SFX T gtis    kimės           gtis      
SFX T gtis    kitės           gtis      
SFX T ti      damas           ti        
SFX T ti      dama            ti        
SFX T ti      dami            ti        
SFX T ti      damos           ti        
SFX T tis     damasis         tis       
SFX T tis     damasi          tis       
SFX T tis     damiesi         tis       
SFX T tis     damosi          tis       
SFX T ti      davus           ti        
SFX T tis     davusis         tis       
SFX T ti      siantis         [^szšž]ti 
SFX T sti     siantis         sti       
SFX T šti     šiantis         šti       
SFX T zti     siantis         zti       
SFX T žti     šiantis         žti       
SFX T ti      davęs           ti        
SFX T ti      davusio         ti        
SFX T ti      davusiam        ti        
SFX T ti      davusį          ti        
SFX T ti      davusiu         ti        
SFX T ti      davusiame       ti        
SFX T ti      davę            ti        
SFX T ti      davusių         ti        
SFX T ti      davusiems       ti        
SFX T ti      davusius        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiais       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuose      ti        
SFX T ti      davusi          ti        
SFX T ti      davusios        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiai        ti        
SFX T ti      davusią         ti        
SFX T ti      davusia         ti        
SFX T ti      davusioje       ti        
SFX T ti      davusioj        ti        
SFX T ti      davusioms       ti        
SFX T ti      davusias        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiomis      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiose       ti        
SFX T ti      davusysis       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiojo       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiajam      ti        
SFX T ti      davusįjį        ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuoju      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiajame     ti        
SFX T ti      davusieji       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiųjų       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiesiems    ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuosius    ti        
SFX T ti      davusiaisiais   ti        
SFX T ti      davusiuosiuose  ti        
SFX T ti      davusioji       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosios     ti        
SFX T ti      davusiajai      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiąją       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiąja       ti        
SFX T ti      davusiojoje     ti        
SFX T ti      davusiojoj      ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosioms    ti        
SFX T ti      davusiąsias     ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosiomis   ti        
SFX T ti      davusiosiose    ti        
SFX T ti      siąs            [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančio         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiam        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siantį          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiu         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiame       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      sią             [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančių         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siantiems       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančius        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiais       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiuose      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      sianti          [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančios        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiai        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančią         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančia         [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančioje       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančioj        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančioms       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančias        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiomis      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiose       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siantysis       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiojo       [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiajam      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siantįjį        [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiuoju      [^šžsz]ti 
SFX T ti      siančiajame     [^šžsz]ti 
