prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
adresuoti/TNXh
aktyvuotis/T
apgaudynėti/TNX
archyvuoti/TSXdkpw
asfaltuoti/TNXdp
atostogauti/TNXfiv
aukotis/T
aušintis/T
automatizuotis/T
baiginėti/TSXdefjkl
balnoti/TSXefhqrt
barstyti/TSXacdefhlmnopqrtvx
bendrauti/TNXf
blevyzgoti/TNXfirvx
brangintis/T
brautis/T
bujoti/TSXdkl
centruotis/T
dairyti/TSXmr
dalyvauti/TNXfkv
daugintis/T
dažyti/TSXadefhjlpqrtvx
deklamuotis/T
dekoruoti/TNXdf
demaskuoti/TSX
dengti/TSXabdefhijlmnqrtuvx
dėstyti/TNXdejkp
didėti/TNXf
diferencijuotis/T
dirbti/TSXabcdefhijklmopqrtvwx
domėtis/T
draikyti/TSXdfjkpv
drebintis/T
driekti/TSXepq
drumsti/TSXkw
duoti/TSXbcdfghjklnprstwx
dvigubinti/TSXfrw
džiūgauti/TSXf
eitis/T
eksportuoti/TNXd
emigruoti/TNX
erzintis/T
faktorizuoti/TSXk
filtruotis/T
formuluoti/TNXhkw
funkcionuoti/TNX
gailėti/TSXaf
galvoti/TSXadfhijkmptvw
garsinti/TSXacdefmor
gaubtis/T
gebėti/TNXk
gelbėti/TSXdfp
gerinti/NTeXfkrvw
gesti/TNXadefjklr
gimti/TNXbclmnp
girdėtis/T
girti/TSXdfjnprtv
gyventi/TSXabdfhijkmoquvw
graduoti/TNXhk
gražintis/T
greitinti/TSXcfor
grįsti/TSXfr
groti/TSXbdfhijklnoqrtuvw
gulėti/TSXbdefinvwx
gurkšnoti/TNXf
identifikuoti/TSX
ilgėti/TSXfip
ilsėti/TSXfnprv
imti/TSXabdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
inicializuotis/T
inkorporuoti/TNX
internacionalizuotis/T
invertuotis/T
irtis/T
įtakoti/TNX
jotis/T
judinti/TSXdfikprw
juoktis/T
kabintis/T
kaityti/TSX
kamuotis/T
kartotis/T
keikti/TSXabdiklpqruvw
keliauti/TSXabdefgijv
keptis/T
keverzoti/TNXadfj
kilnoti/TSXbdefhjklnqvwx
kirsti/TSXbcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
klampotis/T
klausytis/T
klysti/TNXbdefijklr
klostyti/TSXabeklmnqwx
kolekcionuoti/TNX
kompiliuotis/T
komponuoti/TSXchkow
kondensuotis/T
konfigūruoti/STeXfhjkqrtvw
konsultuoti/TSXfr
kontroliuotis/T
koordinuotis/T
koptis/T
kraipytis/T
kratytis/T
krėsti/TNXacdefjklmopqvwx
kūrenti/TSXacdfijkoprv
kviesti/TSXdfjklprvwx
laimėti/TNXi
lankytis/T
lauktis/T
lavinti/TSXdfipr
leisti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
lenktis/T
lėtinti/TSXfhjkrtvx
lietis/T
linkėti/TNXfr
liptis/T
lygintis/T
lokalizuoti/TSX
mainytis/T
maitintis/T
malti/TSXcdfhjkoprvw
mąstyti/TNXafhkw
matuotis/T
mautis/T
mėgauti/TSXr
megztis/T
meluoti/TNXfjkmv
mėtytis/T
migti/TNXceikl
miršti/TNXfjlrvx
mokėtis/T
mokyti/TSXadfijpqrtvw
moralizuoti/TNX
nagrinėtis/T
nakvoti/TNXfh
nebūti/TNX
nervinti/TSXfjklrvw
nokti/TNXehij
numeruotis/T
nuomotis/T
optimizuotis/T
orientuoti/TSXhtvw
pakuoti/TSXcdhkoptw
pasakotis/T
pažinti/TSXbdjmvw
perėti/TNXdjpv
piktintis/T
pildyti/TSXbdfhjlprtvx
pirkti/TSXabcdefhijklmnpqvwx
pyptelėti/TNX
plaktis/T
platintis/T
plėstis/T
ploti/TSXacfijklovw
prakaituoti/TNXdjk
prasti/TNXbcfhjkmw
prilygti/TNX
programuoti/TSXfhjklnrvwx
purtytis/T
pustyti/TSXbcdefjklpr
raišioti/TSXabefhjklqrvx
rašyti/TSXabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
realizuotis/T
redukuoti/TSXkw
reglamentuoti/NTX
reikėti/TNX
rėkti/TNXadfhlp
rengtis/T
reprezentuotis/T
ribotis/T
rikiuotis/T
rištis/T
ryškintis/T
rodinėti/TNXacefor
ruoštis/T
rūšiuoti/TSXabdfhknptw
šaldytis/T
sąlygoti/TNX
saugoti/TSXadfklmprx
šauti/TSXabcdefhqt
sekioti/NTXfh
senti/TNXefhk
šiauštis/T
šifruotis/T
simbolizuotis/T
sirgti/TNXafhiknopqv
siūtis/T
skaičiuoti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
skaitytis/T
skambinti/TSXafhjnrvw
skenuotis/T
skęsti/NTeXf
skirtis/T
skleidinėti/TNX
skliausti/TSXabkmnw
skraidinti/TNXbef
skusti/TSXacdefijkmpqruvw
slaugyti/TNXaf
šliaužti/TSXabcdefghijkl
slysti/TNXcdefi
smukti/TNXacdikl
snūsti/TNXaejl
šoktelėti/TNX
spalvinti/TNXef
spaudinėti/TNXabcdefjklmqrvwx
specializuotis/T
spirginti/TNXafjr
stabdytis/T
standartizuotis/T
statyti/TSXabcdefhjklmnoqrtvwx
steigti/TSXcjov
stiprintis/T
stovėti/TSXbdefinoqvwx
stumdytis/T
sukinėtis/T
sunkinti/TSXafmrv
suskambti/TNX
svajoti/TNXdfijovx
švelninti/TNXfk
šviesti/TSXabcefhimnqrt
svirti/TNXef
taisyti/TSXabcdefjklmnorvwx
tapti/TNXfjk
taupyti/TNXfjkrvw
teirautis/T
telktis/T
terorizuoti/TNX
tikėti/TSXcfr
tilti/TNXejl
tyčioti/TSXpr
tranzuotis/T
trikdyti/TSXfkw
trūkinėti/TNXbceik
tuokti/TSXdekpw
tvertis/T
vadintis/T
vaipytis/T
valyti/TSXadefimpqruv
vartyti/TSXdefkvw
vedžioti/TSXadfjkr
vertinti/TSXcefhkw
vestis/T
vienytis/T
vinguriuoti/TSXdefvw
vystytis/T
žadinti/TNXfjkrv
žinotis/T
žymėtis/T
žvelgti/TSXacefhimnoqrtw
